Utah statutes.
62A-15-608.   Local mental health authority -- Supervision and treatment of
mentally ill persons.
(1)  Each local mental health authority has responsibility for supervision and
treatment of mentally ill persons who have been committed to its custody under
the provisions of this part, whether residing in the state hospital or
elsewhere.
(2)  The division, in administering and supervising the security
responsibilities of the state hospital under its authority provided by Section
62A-15-603, shall enforce Sections 62A-15-620 through 62A-15-624 to the extent
they pertain to the state hospital.
